Utah statutes.
31A-22-319.   Prohibition on insurer requiring certain parts -- Disclosure.
(1)  Unless the insured is given notice in writing an insurer may not specify
the use of non-OEM aftermarket crash parts in the repair of an insured's motor
vehicle.  The notice  required by Subsection (1) shall identify non-OEM parts
as not made for or by the vehicle manufacturer.
(2)  Unless the consumer is given notice in writing prior to installation, a
repair facility or installer may not use non-OEM aftermarket parts to repair a
vehicle.
(3)  In all instances where non-OEM aftermarket crash parts are intended for
use by an insurer:
(a)  the written estimate shall clearly identify each non-OEM aftermarket
crash part; and
(b)  a disclosure document containing the following statements in 10 point or
larger type shall appear on or be attached to the insured's copy of the
estimate: "This estimate has been prepared based on the use of crash parts
supplied by a source other than the manufacturer of your motor vehicle.
Warranties applicable to these replacement parts are provided by the
manufacturer or distributor of these parts rather than the manufacturer of
your vehicle."
